District of Columbia statutes.
16-2347

Death of respondent; liability of estate.

If the respondent dies after parentage has been established and prior to the time the child reaches the age at which the child ceases to be a minor, any sums due and unpaid under an order of the court at the time of his or her death shall constitute a valid claim against his or her estate.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 592, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 545, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 20(f), 23 DCR 2544

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2347.
1973 Ed., § 16-2347.